District of Columbia statutes.
6-1108.02

Effect of District undertaking; comment by State Historic Preservation Officer.

Before authorizing the expenditure of funds for design or construction or seeking the permit, license, or approval for a District of Columbia undertaking, the head of the District of Columbia governmental entity, public charter school, or other entity with direct jurisdiction over the undertaking shall take into account the effect of that undertaking on any property listed or eligible for listing in the District of Columbia Inventory of Historic Sites and shall consult with and afford the State Historic Preservation Officer a reasonable opportunity to comment on the undertaking.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-144, § 9b
as added Nov. 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-185, § 2(l), 53 DCR 6712
Mar. 14, 2014, D.C. Law 20-95, § 2(b), 61 DCR 966

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-95 substituted “the head of the District of Columbia governmental entity, public charter school, or other entity” for “the Deputy Mayor, head of the subordinate agency, or head of the independent agency.”